Utah statutes.
10-9a-408.   Biennial review of moderate income housing element of general plan.

(1)  The legislative body of each city shall biennially:

(a)  review the moderate income housing plan element of its general plan and its implementation; and

(b)  prepare a report setting forth the findings of the review.

(2)  Each report under Subsection (1) shall include a description of:

(a)  efforts made by the city to reduce, mitigate, or eliminate local regulatory barriers to moderate income housing;

(b)  actions taken by the city to encourage preservation of existing moderate income housing and development of new moderate income housing;

(c)  progress made within the city to provide moderate income housing, as measured by permits issued for new units of moderate income housing; and

(d)  efforts made by the city to coordinate moderate income housing plans and actions with neighboring municipalities.

(3)  The legislative body of each city shall send a copy of the report under Subsection (1) to the Department of Workforce Services and the association of governments in which the city is located.

(4)  In a civil action seeking enforcement or claiming a violation of this section or of Subsection 10-9a-404(5)(c), a plaintiff may not recover damages but may be awarded only injunctive or other equitable relief.

